Utah statutes.
59-1-204.   Oath and bond.
Before entering upon the duties of office, a member of the commission shall
qualify by taking the constitutional oath of office and giving a bond to the
state in an amount prescribed by the director of the Division of Finance.  The
oath and bond shall be recorded and filed.  Bond premiums shall be paid by the
state.
